Washington statutes.
RCW 32.34.030

Savings banks converted to stock form—Voluntary liquidation, transfer of assets, merger, consolidation, etc.—Approval of directors and shareholders.

(1) The voluntary liquidation of a mutual savings bank converted to the stock form requires the affirmative vote or written consent of two-thirds of the directors of the converted savings bank, requires the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the outstanding stock of the savings bank, shall proceed as prescribed in chapter 32.24 RCW, and shall be complete upon the payment of any surplus remaining, after satisfaction of all debts and liabilities of the savings bank, to shareholders in accordance with their legal rights to such surplus.

(2) A savings bank which has converted to the stock form may sell all its assets and transfer all its liabilities upon the affirmative vote or with the written consent of two-thirds of its directors, and upon the affirmative vote of the holders of two-thirds of the outstanding voting shares in each class entitled to vote.

(3) Any merger or consolidation involving a mutual savings bank converted to stock form requires approval by two-thirds of the directors and by the holders of a majority of the outstanding voting shares in each class except that a merger or consolidation approved by two-thirds of the outstanding voting shares in each class requires approval by only a majority of the directors of the converted savings bank, and except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) A savings bank that has converted to the stock form may engage in a consolidation or merger upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of its directors, if (a) the transaction is with a wholly-owned subsidiary of the converted savings bank, or (b)(i) the transaction is incident to the establishment of a holding company pursuant to RCW 32.34.040 or 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1467a, (ii) each shareholder will, immediately after the effective date of such transaction, hold the same number of shares of the holding company, with substantially the same designations, preferences, limitations, and rights, as the shares of the converted savings bank that the shareholder held immediately before the effective date, and (iii) the number of authorized shares of the holding company will, immediately after the effective date, be the same as the number of authorized shares of the converted savings bank immediately before the effective date, or (c)(i) the total assets of the converted savings bank, immediately prior to the effective date of the transaction, exceed two-thirds of the assets of the institution that would result from the transaction and (ii) the converted savings bank will survive the transaction without its shareholders surrendering their shares of stock in the converted savings bank.

(5) Any converted savings bank may provide in its articles of incorporation for a higher percentage of affirmative shareholder votes to approve any liquidation, sale of assets, merger, or consolidation.

[ 1994 c 256 s 115; 1985 c 56 s 33.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.